Kentucky statutes. TITLE XL Crimes and Punishments
CHAPTER 431 General Provisions Concerning Crimes and Punishments

431.005.
Arrest by peace officers — By private persons.

A peace officer may make an arrest:

In obedience to a warrant; or

Without a warrant when a felony is committed in his or her presence; or

Without a warrant when he or she has probable cause to believe that the person being arrested has committed a felony; or

Without a warrant when a misdemeanor, as defined in KRS

431.060

, has been committed in his or her presence; or

Without a warrant when a violation of KRS

189.290

,

189.393

,

189.520

,

189.580

,

511.080

, or

525.070

has been committed in his or her presence, except that a violation of KRS

189A.010

or KRS

281A.210

need not be committed in his or her presence in order to make an arrest without a warrant if the officer has probable cause to believe that the person being arrested has violated KRS

189A.010

or KRS

281A.210

;

Without a warrant when a violation of KRS

508.030

has occurred in a hospital without the officer’s presence if the officer has probable cause to believe that the person being arrested has violated KRS

508.030

. As used in this paragraph, “hospital” includes any property owned or used by a hospital as a parking lot or parking garage; or

Without a warrant when a violation of KRS 235.240(2) has occurred causing an accident, occurring outside of the peace officer’s presence, involving a motorboat or vessel on the waters of the Commonwealth, and resulting in a physical injury or property damage, and a commissioned peace officer has probable cause to determine who the operator of the motorboat or vessel was and that operator was intoxicated or under the influence of any substance that impairs one’s ability to operate the motorboat or vessel at the time of the accident.

Any peace officer may arrest a person without warrant when the peace officer has probable cause to believe that the person has intentionally or wantonly caused physical injury to a family member, member of an unmarried couple, or another person with whom the person was or is in a dating relationship.

As used in this subsection, “dating relationship,” “family member,” and “member of an unmarried couple” have the same meanings as defined in KRS

403.720

and

456.010

.

For the purpose of this subsection, the term “member of an unmarried couple” has the same meaning as set out in KRS

403.720

.

A peace officer may arrest a person without a warrant when the peace officer has probable cause to believe that the person is a sexual offender who has failed to comply with the Kentucky Sex Offender Registry requirements based upon information received from the Law Information Network of Kentucky.

For purposes of subsections (2) and (3) of this section, a “peace officer” is an officer certified pursuant to KRS

15.380

.

If a law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that a person has violated a condition of release imposed in accordance with KRS

431.064

and verifies that the alleged violator has notice of the conditions, the officer shall, without a warrant, arrest the alleged violator whether the violation was committed in or outside the presence of the officer.

A private person may make an arrest when a felony has been committed in fact and he or she has probable cause to believe that the person being arrested has committed it.

If a law enforcement officer has probable cause to believe that a person has violated a restraining order issued under KRS

508.155

, then the officer shall, without a warrant, arrest the alleged violator whether the violation was committed in or outside the presence of the officer.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 234, § 31; 1980, ch. 309, § 1; 1980, ch. 312, § 1, effective July 15, 1980; 1984, ch. 165, § 23, effective July 13, 1984; 1988, ch. 258, § 5, effective July 15, 1988; 1990, ch. 455, § 33, effective July 13, 1990; 1992, ch. 172, § 14, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 345, § 4, effective July 15, 1996; 1998, ch. 23, § 16, effective July 15, 1998; 2002, ch. 119, § 3, effective July 15, 2002; 2005, ch. 132, § 31, effective June 20, 2005; 2006, ch. 182, § 24, effective July 12, 2006; 2010, ch. 170, § 17, effective July 15, 2010; 2012, ch. 128, § 1, effective July 12, 2012; 2015 ch. 102, § 42, effective January 1, 2016; 2017 ch. 23, § 1, effective June 29, 2017; 2019 ch. 171, § 3, effective June 27, 2019.

431.007.
Arrest powers of peace officers assisting in another county — Exception.

A peace officer certified pursuant to KRS

15.380

to

15.404

, who is directly employed as a police officer by a Kentucky city, county, or urban-county government and whose department meets the requirements of KRS

15.440

and a sheriff, or deputy sheriff who has been certified pursuant to KRS

15.380

to

15.404

, who is officially requested by a law enforcement agency in another county in Kentucky to assist in any matter within the jurisdiction of the requesting agency shall possess, while responding to and for the duration of the matter for which the request was made, the same powers of arrest in the requesting county as he possesses in the county in which he is a police officer.

The provisions of this section shall not:

Authorize assistance in any labor dispute or strike;

Authorize assistance by a constable or deputy constable;

Authorize assistance by a special local peace officer; or

Authorize assistance by a special deputy sheriff.

History.

Enact. Acts 1986, ch. 120, § 1, effective July 15, 1986; 2007, ch. 108, § 1, effective June 26, 2007.

431.008.
Insurance coverage for assistance rendered under KRS 431.007.

When a peace officer specified in KRS

431.007

is lawfully conducting an assistance operation under KRS

431.007

, any insurance relative to the performance of his duties, including, but not limited to, workers’ compensation, health, liability, and motor vehicle insurance, maintained by the peace officer or the peace officer’s employer, shall remain in force.

History.

Enact. Acts 2000, ch. 515, § 1, effective July 14, 2000.

431.010.
Offenses — Where tried.
[Reenacted as KRS 452.510.]

431.015.
Citation for misdemeanor — Failure to appear.

KRS

431.005

to the contrary notwithstanding, and except as provided in paragraphs (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection, a peace officer shall issue a citation instead of making an arrest for a misdemeanor committed in his or her presence, if there are reasonable grounds to believe that the person being cited will appear to answer the charge. The citation shall provide that the defendant shall appear within a designated time.

A peace officer may make an arrest instead of issuing a citation for a misdemeanor committed in his or her presence if the misdemeanor is:

A violation of KRS Chapter 508, 510, or 527, or KRS

189A.010

,

511.050

,

511.085

,

514.110

, or

523.110

;

An offense in which the defendant poses a risk of danger to himself, herself, or another person; or

An offense in which the defendant refuses to follow the peace officer’s reasonable instructions.

A peace officer shall make an arrest for violations of protective orders issued pursuant to KRS

403.715

to

403.785

or an order of protection as defined in KRS

456.010

.

A peace officer may make an arrest or may issue a citation for a violation of KRS

508.030

which occurs in a hospital pursuant to KRS

431.005

(1)(f).

A peace officer may issue a citation instead of making an arrest for a violation committed in his or her presence but may not make a physical arrest unless there are reasonable grounds to believe that the defendant, if a citation is issued, will not appear at the designated time or unless the offense charged is a violation of KRS

189.223

,

189.290

,

189.393

,

189.520

,

189.580

,

235.240

,

281.600

,

511.080

, or

525.070

committed in his or her presence or a violation of KRS

189A.010

, not committed in his or her presence, for which an arrest without a warrant is permitted under KRS 431.005(1)(e).

A peace officer may issue a citation when he or she has probable cause to believe that the person being issued the citation has committed a misdemeanor outside of his or her presence, if there are reasonable grounds to believe that the person being cited will appear to answer the charge. The citation shall provide that the defendant shall appear within a designated time.

If the defendant fails to appear in response to the citation, or if there are reasonable grounds to believe that he or she will not appear, a complaint may be made before a judge and a warrant shall issue.

When a physical arrest is made and a citation is issued in relation to the same offense the officer shall mark on the citation, in the place specified for court appearance date, the word “ARRESTED” in lieu of the date of court appearance.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 234, § 33; 1976 (Ex. Sess.), ch. 14, § 437, effective January 2, 1978; 1978, ch. 26, § 1, effective March 3, 1978; 1980, ch. 309, § 2, effective July 15, 1980; 1984, ch. 165, § 25, effective July 13, 1984; 2000, ch. 512, § 10, effective July 14, 2000; 2011, ch. 2, § 46, effective June 8, 2011; 2012, ch. 128, § 2, effective July 12, 2012; 2015 ch. 102, § 43, effective January 1, 2016; 2016 ch. 98, § 1, effective July 15, 2016; 2017 ch. 23, § 2, effective June 29, 2017; 2018 ch. 189, § 2, effective July 14, 2018.

431.017.
Appearance bond of prosecuting witness.

A judge, trial commissioner, or other officer issuing an arrest warrant based upon the testimony or allegations of a prosecuting witness may require the witness to post a bond in favor of the Commonwealth to secure the attendance of that witness in court in all matters relating to that particular arrest warrant. The amount of the bond shall be twenty-five dollars ($25). In the event that the prosecuting witness fails to appear and does not present valid reason therefor, the trial court shall order the forfeiture of the bond. This section shall not apply to any appeal or postconviction proceeding.

History.

Enact. Acts 1982, ch. 225, § 1, effective July 15, 1982.

431.020.
Jurisdiction when doubt exists as to where offense was committed. [Reenacted as KRS 452.620.]

431.021.
Guaranteed arrest bond certificate of surety company to be accepted in lieu of cash bail in traffic cases.

A guaranteed arrest bond certificate presented by the person whose signature appears thereon shall be accepted in lieu of cash bail in an amount not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200) as a bail bond to guarantee the appearance of such person in any court of this Commonwealth, at the time required by such court, when he is arrested for violation of any law of this Commonwealth or traffic ordinance of any municipality therein relating to the operation of a motor vehicle. A guaranteed arrest bond certificate so presented as a bail bond is subject to the same forfeiture and enforcement provisions as a bail bond or cash bail, but is not subject to Rules 4.30 and 4.34 of the Kentucky Rules of Criminal Procedure. However:

The violation must have been committed prior to the expiration date shown on the guaranteed arrest bond certificate, and

A guaranteed arrest bond certificate may not be accepted when a person is arrested for violation of KRS

189A.010

or KRS Chapter 281.

As used in this section, “guaranteed arrest bond certificate” means a printed card or other certificate issued by an association to any of its members, which is signed by the member and contains a printed statement that such association and a surety company licensed to do business in this Commonwealth:

Guarantee the appearance of the person whose signature appears on the card or certificate, and

Will, in the event of the failure of such person to appear in court at the time set for appearance, pay any fine or forfeiture imposed upon such person in an amount not to exceed two hundred dollars ($200).

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 1962, ch. 283, § 1; 1968, ch. 152, § 167; 1980, ch. 188, § 298, effective July 15, 1980; 1984, ch. 165, § 24, effective July 13, 1984.

Opinions of Attorney General.

Bail bonding by motor clubs, such as AAA, is in compliance with the statutory law in this State.

OAG 78-56

.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Bail and recognizance, RCr 4.00 to 4.58.

431.025.
Notice of intention to arrest — Act of arrest — Force.

The person making an arrest shall inform the person about to be arrested of the intention to arrest him, and of the offense for which he is being arrested.

An arrest is made by placing the person being arrested in restraint, or by his submission to the custody of the person making the arrest. The submission shall be in the actual presence of the arrester.

No unnecessary force or violence shall be used in making an arrest.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 234, § 35.

431.030.
River or road dividing counties — Concurrent jurisdiction.
[Reenacted as KRS 452.520.]

431.035.
Aid in making arrest. [Repealed.]

431.040.
Counties on rivers along state boundary — Concurrent jurisdiction of circuit courts. [Reenacted as KRS 452.530.]

431.045.
Pursuit in effecting arrest.

A peace officer in actual pursuit may continue such pursuit across corporate or county lines for the purpose of making an arrest.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 234, § 39.

Opinions of Attorney General.

A third-class city ordinance restricting the use of city owned vehicles beyond one mile of the city limits except police vehicles in “hot pursuit” in felony situations is a proper exercise of legislative power and is not in conflict with any state statute concerning the law enforcement powers and duties of police.

OAG 74-380

.

Where a peace officer in hot pursuit has continued across corporate or county lines, as authorized by this section, for purposes of making an arrest outside of his jurisdiction, he may properly arrest a third person who is resisting the arrest of the original offender, as prohibited by KRS

520.090

, so long as the peace officer is in uniform or otherwise acting under the color of his authority.

OAG 81-152

.

While police officers of a sixth class city have a statutory obligation to rigidly enforce the provisions of KRS

189.520

, they can only enforce this statute or any other statute within their jurisdictional area of authority; generally, the jurisdiction of such police officers to arrest for offenses against the state is limited to the city limits of their particular city. However, where sixth class cities are operating under an interlocal agreement, the jurisdiction is extended to include the city limits of all of the cities which are parties to the agreement; also under the appropriate circumstances the jurisdiction of a sixth class city police officer could be expanded by the utilization of the concept of hot pursuit under this section.

OAG 82-599

.

431.050.
Injury in one county, death in another.
[Reenacted as KRS 452.560.]

431.055.
Pursuit to recapture escapee.

If a person lawfully arrested escapes or is rescued, the person from whose custody he escaped or was rescued may immediately pursue and retake him in any part of the Commonwealth and may be joined in the pursuit and recapture by peace officers in the immediate area or vicinity.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 234, § 41.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Use of physical force to prevent escape, KRS

503.090

.

431.060.
Felonies, misdemeanors and violations defined.

Offenses are either felonies, misdemeanors, or violations:

Offenses punishable by death or confinement in the penitentiary, whether or not a fine or other penalty may also be assessed, are felonies.

Offenses punishable by confinement other than in the penitentiary, whether or not a fine or other penalty may also be assessed, are misdemeanors.

Offenses punishable by a fine only or by any other penalty not cited herein, whether in combination with a fine or not, are violations.

History.

1127: amend. Acts 1980, ch. 309, § 3, effective July 1, 1980.

431.062.
Detention in jail prior to trial prohibited for certain offenses, exceptions.

No person shall be detained in jail prior to trial for any offense defined in KRS

431.060

,

500.080

, or

532.020

as a violation unless:

He has previously failed to make a court appearance required in connection therewith; or

Is a fugitive from justice.

This section shall not apply to the offenses listed in KRS

431.015

or

222.202

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1984, ch. 92, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1986, ch. 336, § 6, effective July 1, 1986.

431.063.
Human trafficking victim not to be incarcerated pending trial — Exceptions.

A victim of human trafficking shall not be held in a detention center, jail, or other secure facility pending trial for an offense arising from the human trafficking situation, except where the incarceration is found to be the least restrictive alternative to securing the appearance of that person before the court or the release of the person under any other reasonable condition would be a clear threat to public safety.

History.

Enact. Acts 2007, ch. 19, § 2, effective June 26, 2007.

Research References and Practice Aids

Kentucky Bench & Bar.

Hunt, Human Trafficking: A Primer for Kentucky Lawyers. Vol. 73, No. 4, July 2009, Ky. Bench & Bar, 17.

431.064.
Pretrial release of person arrested for assault, sexual offense, or violation of protective order — Conditions — Hearing — Victim entitled to copy of conditions of release — Entry of conditions into Law Information Network — Penalty.

In making a decision concerning pretrial release of a person who is arrested for a violation of KRS Chapter 508 or 510, or charged with a crime involving a violation of an order of protection as defined in KRS

403.720

and

456.010

, the court or agency having authority to make a decision concerning pretrial release shall review the facts of the arrest and detention of the person and determine whether the person:

Is a threat to the alleged victim or other family or household member; and

Is reasonably likely to appear in court.

Before releasing a person arrested for or charged with a crime specified in subsection (1) of this section, the court shall make findings, on the record if possible, concerning the determination made in accordance with subsection (1) of this section, and may impose conditions of release or bail on the person to protect the alleged victim of domestic violence or abuse and to ensure the appearance of the person at a subsequent court proceeding. The conditions may include:

An order enjoining the person from threatening to commit or committing acts of domestic violence or abuse against the alleged victim or other family or household member;

An order prohibiting the person from harassing, annoying, telephoning, contacting, or otherwise communicating with the alleged victim, either directly or indirectly;

An order directing the person to vacate or stay away from the home of the alleged victim and to stay away from any other location where the victim is likely to be;

An order prohibiting the person from using or possessing a firearm or other weapon specified by the court;

An order prohibiting the person from possession or consumption of alcohol or controlled substances;

Any other order required to protect the safety of the alleged victim and to ensure the appearance of the person in court; or

Any combination of the orders set out in paragraphs (a) to (f) of this subsection.

If conditions of release are imposed, the court imposing the conditions on the arrested or charged person shall:

Issue a written order for conditional release; and

Immediately distribute a copy of the order to pretrial services.

The court shall provide a copy of the conditions to the arrested or charged person upon release. Failure to provide the person with a copy of the conditions of release does not invalidate the conditions if the arrested or charged person has notice of the conditions.

If conditions of release are imposed without a hearing, the arrested or charged person may request a prompt hearing before the court to review the conditions. Upon request, the court shall hold a prompt hearing to review the conditions.

The victim, as defined in KRS

421.500

, of the defendant’s alleged crime, or an individual designated by the victim in writing, shall be entitled to a free certified copy of the defendant’s conditions of release, or modified conditions of release, upon request to the clerk of the court which issued the order releasing the defendant. The victim or the victim’s designee may personally obtain the document at the clerk’s office or may have it delivered by mail.

The circuit clerk or the circuit clerk’s designee, in cooperation with the court that issued the order releasing the defendant, shall cause the conditions of release to be entered into the computer system maintained by the clerk and the Administrative Office of the Courts within twenty-four (24) hours following its filing, excluding weekends and holidays. Any modification of the release conditions shall likewise be entered by the circuit clerk, or the circuit clerk’s designee.

The information entered under this section shall be accessible to any agency designated by the Department of Kentucky State Police as a terminal agency for the Law Information Network of Kentucky.

All orders issued under this section which require entry into the Law Information Network of Kentucky shall be entered on forms prescribed by the Administrative Office of the Courts. If the conditions of pretrial release are contained in an order which is narrative in nature, the prescribed form shall be used in addition to the narrative order.

Any person who violates any condition of an order issued pursuant to this section is guilty of a Class A misdemeanor.

History.

Enact. Acts 1996, ch. 345, § 5, effective July 15, 1996; 2000, ch. 400, § 3, effective July 14, 2000; 2007, ch. 85, § 309, effective June 26, 2007; 2015 ch. 102, § 44, effective January 1, 2016.

431.065.
Attempt to commit offense — Penalties. [Repealed.]

431.066.
Pretrial release and bail options of verified and eligible defendant — Assessment of flight risk, likelihood of appearing at trial, and risk of danger — Credit toward bail for time in jail.

For purposes of this section, “verified and eligible defendant” means a defendant who pretrial services is able to interview and assess, and whose identity pretrial services is able to confirm through investigation.

When a court considers pretrial release and bail for an arrested defendant, the court shall consider whether the defendant constitutes a flight risk, is unlikely to appear for trial, or is likely to be a danger to the public if released. In making this determination, the court shall consider the pretrial risk assessment for a verified and eligible defendant along with the factors set forth in KRS

431.525

.

If a verified and eligible defendant poses low risk of flight, is likely to appear for trial, and is not likely to be a danger to others, the court shall order the defendant released on unsecured bond or on the defendant’s own recognizance subject to such other conditions as the court may order.

If a verified and eligible defendant poses a moderate risk of flight, has a moderate risk of not appearing for trial, or poses a moderate risk of danger to others, the court shall release the defendant under the same conditions as in subsection (3) of this section but shall consider ordering the defendant to participate in global positioning system monitoring, controlled substance testing, increased supervision, or such other conditions as the court may order.

Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, regardless of the amount of the bail set, the court shall permit the defendant a credit of one hundred dollars ($100) per day as a payment toward the amount of the bail set for each day or portion of a day that the defendant remains in jail prior to trial. Upon the service of sufficient days in jail to have sufficient credit to satisfy the bail, the defendant shall be released from jail on the conditions specified in this section or in this chapter.

The provisions of paragraph (a) of this subsection shall not apply to:

Any person convicted of, pleading guilty to, or entering an Alford plea to a felony offense under KRS Chapter 510, KRS

529.100

involving commercial sexual activity, KRS

530.020

, 530.064(1)(a),

531.310

, or

531.320

, or who is a violent offender as defined in KRS

439.3401

; or

A defendant who is found by the court to present a flight risk or to be a danger to others.

For purposes of this subsection, “a day or portion of a day” means any time spent in a detention facility following booking.

A defendant shall not earn credit pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection while also earning credit pursuant to KRS

534.070

.

If a court determines that a defendant shall not be released pursuant to subsection (5) of this section, the court shall document the reasons for denying the release in a written order.

The jailer shall be responsible for tracking the credit earned by a defendant pursuant to subsection (5) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 2, § 48, effective June 8, 2011; 2012, ch. 156, § 1, effective July 12, 2012.

431.067.
Participation in global positioning monitoring system program as condition of pretrial release.

When considering the pretrial release of a person whose pretrial risk assessment indicates he or she is a moderate or high risk defendant, the court considering the release may order as a condition of pretrial release that the person participate in a global positioning monitoring system program under the same terms and conditions provided in KRS

431.517

during all or part of the person’s period of pretrial release.

History.

Enact. Acts 2011, ch. 2, § 45, effective June 8, 2011.

431.068.
Use of alcohol monitoring device as condition of pretrial release.

When considering the pretrial release of a person whose pretrial risk assessment indicates he or she is a moderate-risk or high-risk defendant, the court considering the release may order as a condition of pretrial release that the person use an alcohol monitoring device during all or part of the person’s period of pretrial release. All costs associated with the alcohol monitoring device, including administrative and operating costs, shall be paid by the defendant. As used in this section, “alcohol monitoring device” means an electronic device that:

Tests for alcohol concentration level through scheduled, random, continuous, or on-demand testing;

Detects and records tampering attempts; and

Transmits the data by means of either a telephone line or cellular uplink, or records the data for retrieval through methods approved by the court.

History.

Enact. Acts 2014, ch. 141, § 1, effective July 15, 2014.

431.070.
When death penalty imposed — Punishment of common-law offense. [Repealed.]

431.073.
Certain felony convictions may be vacated and the records expunged — Application — Hearing — Vacating conviction without a hearing — Order to vacate and expunge — Application form — Fees — Retroactivity.

Any person who has been:

Convicted of a Class D felony violation of KRS

17.175

,

186.990

,

194A.505

,

194B.505

,

217.181

,

217.207

,

217.208

,

218A.140

,

218A.1415

,

218A.1416

,

218A.1417

,

218A.1418

,

218A.1423

,

218A.1439

,

218A.282

,

218A.284

,

218A.286

,

218A.320

,

218A.322

,

218A.324

,

218A.500

,

244.165

,

286.11-057

,

304.47-025

,

324.990

,

365.241

,

434.155

,

434.675

,

434.850

,

434.872

,

511.040

,

512.020

,

514.030

,

514.040

,

514.050

,

514.060

,

514.065

,

514.070

,

514.080

,

514.090

,

514.100

,

514.110

,

514.120

,

514.140

,

514.150

,

514.160

,

516.030

,

516.060

,

516.090

,

516.108

,

517.120

,

518.040

,

522.040

,

524.100

,

525.113

,

526.020

,

526.030

,

528.020

,

528.040

,

528.050

,

530.010

, or

530.050

;

Convicted of a series of Class D felony violations of one (1) or more statutes enumerated in paragraph (a) of this subsection arising from a single incident;

Granted a full pardon; or

Convicted of a Class D felony, or an offense prior to January 1, 1975 which was punishable by not more than five (5) years’ incarceration, which was not a violation of KRS

189A.010

,

508.032

, or

519.055

, abuse of public office, a sex offense, or an offense committed against a child, and did not result in serious bodily injury or death; or of a series of felony offenses eligible under this paragraph;

may file with the court in which he or she was convicted an application to have the judgment vacated. The application shall be filed as a motion in the original criminal case. The person shall be informed of the right at the time of adjudication.

A verified application to have the judgment vacated under this section shall be filed no sooner than five (5) years after the completion of the person’s sentence, or five (5) years after the successful completion of the person’s probation or parole, whichever occurs later.

Upon the payment of the filing fee and the filing of the application, the Circuit Court clerk shall serve a notice of filing upon the office of the Commonwealth’s attorney or county attorney that prosecuted the case and the county attorney of the county where the judgment was entered. The office of the Commonwealth’s attorney or county attorney that prosecuted the case shall file a response within sixty (60) days after being served with the notice of filing. That time period may be extended for good cause, but the hearing on the application to vacate the judgment shall occur no later than one hundred twenty (120) days following the filing of the application. The inability to determine the location of the crime victim shall constitute good cause for an extension of time. No hearing upon the merits of the application shall be scheduled until the Commonwealth’s response has been filed, or if no response is received, no later than one hundred twenty (120) days after the filing of the application.

In any case in which the Commonwealth objects that the application is grossly incomplete, the court shall order the person or agency originating the application to supplement the application.

Upon the filing of the Commonwealth’s response to an application, or if no response is received, no later than one hundred twenty (120) days after the filing of the application, the court shall set a date for a hearing and the Circuit Court clerk shall notify the office of the Commonwealth’s attorney or county attorney that prosecuted the case. The office of the Commonwealth’s attorney or county attorney that prosecuted the case shall notify the victim of the crime, if there was an identified victim. The Commonwealth’s attorney or county attorney shall be authorized to obtain without payment of any fee information from the Transportation Cabinet regarding the crime victim’s address on file regarding any vehicle operator’s license issued to that person.

In an application pursuant to subsection (1)(d) of this section, upon the filing of the Commonwealth’s response objecting to the vacating of a judgment and expungement of a record, the court shall schedule a hearing within one hundred twenty (120) days of the Commonwealth’s response. The prosecutor shall specify in the objection the reasons for believing a denial of the application is justified. At the hearing at which the applicant or his or her attorney must be present, the applicant must prove by clear and convincing evidence that:

Vacating the judgment and expunging the record is consistent with the welfare and safety of the public;

The action is supported by his or her behavior since the conviction or convictions, as evidenced that he or she has been active in rehabilitative activities in prison and is living a law-abiding life since release;

The vacation and expungement is warranted by the interests of justice; and

Any other matter deemed appropriate or necessary by the court to make a determination regarding the petition for expungement is met.

At the hearing, the applicant may testify as to the specific adverse consequences he or she may be subject to if the application is denied. The court may hear testimony of witnesses and any other matter the court deems proper and relevant to its determination regarding the application. The Commonwealth may present proof of any extraordinary circumstances that exist to deny the application. A victim of any offense listed in the application shall have an opportunity to be heard at any hearing held under this section.

If the court determines that circumstances warrant vacation and expungement and that the harm otherwise resulting to the applicant clearly outweighs the public interest in the criminal history record information being publicly available, then the original conviction or convictions shall be vacated and the records shall be expunged. The order of expungement shall not preclude a prosecutor’s office from retaining a nonpublic record for law enforcement purposes only.

The court may order the judgment vacated, and if the judgment is vacated the court shall dismiss with prejudice any charges which are eligible for expungement under subsection (1) of this section or KRS

431.076

or

431.078

, and, upon full payment of the fee in subsection (11) of this section, order expunged all records in the custody of the court and any records in the custody of any other agency or official, including law enforcement records, if the court finds that:

The person had not, June 27, 2019, had a felony conviction vacated and the record expunged pursuant to this section;

The person had not in the five (5) years prior to the filing of the application to have the judgment vacated been convicted of a felony or a misdemeanor;

No proceeding concerning a felony or misdemeanor is pending or being instituted against the person; and

For an application pursuant to subsection (1)(d) of this section, the person has been rehabilitated and poses no significant threat of recidivism.

If the court has received a response from the office of the Commonwealth’s attorney or county attorney that prosecuted the case stating no objection to the application to have the judgment vacated, or if one hundred twenty (120) days have elapsed since the filing of the application and no response has been received from the victim or the office of the Commonwealth’s attorney or county attorney that prosecuted the case, the court may, without a hearing, vacate the judgment in the manner established in subsection (5) of this section.

Upon entry of an order vacating and expunging a conviction, the original conviction shall be vacated and, upon full payment of the fee in subsection (11) of this section, the record shall be expunged. The court and other agencies shall cause records to be deleted or removed from their computer systems so that the matter shall not appear on official state-performed background checks. The court and other agencies shall reply to any inquiry that no record exists on the matter. The person whose record is expunged shall not have to disclose the fact of the record or any matter relating thereto on an application for employment, credit, or other type of application. If the person is not prohibited from voting for any other reason, the person’s ability to vote shall be restored and the person may register to vote.

An order vacating a conviction under this section shall not extend or revive an expired statute of limitations, shall not constitute a finding of legal error regarding the proceedings leading to or resulting in the conviction, shall not nullify any findings of fact or conclusions of law made by the trial court or any appellate court regarding the conviction, and shall not constitute a finding of innocence regarding the conviction.

The Administrative Office of the Courts shall establish a form application to be used in filing an application to have judgment vacated and records expunged.

The filing fee for an application to have judgment vacated and records expunged shall be fifty dollars ($50), which shall be deposited into a trust and agency account for deputy clerks and shall not be refundable.

Upon the issuance of an order vacating and expunging a conviction pursuant to this section, the applicant shall be charged an expungement fee of two hundred fifty dollars ($250), which may be payable by an installment plan in accordance with KRS

534.020

.

When the order is issued, the court shall set a date, no sooner than eighteen (18) months after the date of the order, by which the defendant must comply with the installment payment plan. The applicant shall be given notice of the total amount due, the payment frequency, and the date by which all payments must be made. The notice shall state that the expungement cannot be completed until full payment is received, and that if the applicant has not completed the installment payment plan by the scheduled date, he or she shall appear on that date to show good cause as to why he or she is unable to satisfy the obligations. Notwithstanding provisions of KRS

534.020

to the contrary, no applicant shall be ordered to jail for failure to complete an installment plan ordered pursuant to this section.

The revenues and interest from the expungement fee shall be deposited in the expungement fund created in KRS

431.0795

.

This section shall be retroactive.

HISTORY:

2016 ch. 94, § 1, effective July 15, 2016; 2019 ch. 188, § 1, effective June 27, 2019.

431.074.
Index of expungement orders — Restricted access.

The Administrative Office of the Courts shall retain an index of expungement orders entered under KRS

431.073

. The index shall only be accessible to persons preparing a certification of eligibility for expungement pursuant to KRS

431.079

. If the index indicates that the person applying for expungement has had a prior felony expunged under KRS

431.073

, the person preparing the report may, notwithstanding the provisions of KRS 431.073, access the expunged record and include information from the expunged record in the certification.

HISTORY:

2016 ch. 94, § 5, effective July 15, 2016.

431.075.
Common-law offenses, penalties for. [Repealed.]